es: Función del módulo de control climático: Módulo amplificador de CA; Módulo de control del actuador de la compuerta de mezcla; Módulo de control del motor del ventilador; Módulo principal de control de HVAC; Módulo de control del relé de HVAC; Módulo de control del actuador de la compuerta de modo; Módulo de control de HVAC trasero; Módulo de climatización de los asientos; Módulo de control del actuador de la compuerta de temperatura; Otro
pt-BR: Função do módulo de controle de temperatura: Módulo amplificador do ar-condicionado; Módulo de controle do atuador da porta de mistura; Módulo de controle do motor do ventilador; Módulo da unidade de controle do HVAC; Módulo de controle do relé do HVAC; Módulo de controle do atuador da porta de modo; Módulo de controle do HVAC traseiro; Módulo de climatização dos assentos; Módulo de controle do atuador da porta de temperatura; Outros
ko: 기후 제어 모듈 기능: AC 증폭기 모듈; 블렌드 도어 액추에이터 제어 모듈; 블로어 모터 제어 모듈; HVAC 제어 헤드 모듈; HVAC 릴레이 제어 모듈; 모드 도어 액추에이터 제어 모듈; 후방 HVAC 제어 모듈; 시트 온도 조절 모듈; 온도 도어 액추에이터 제어 모듈; 기타
tr: İklim kontrol modülü işlevi: Klima amplifikatör modülü; Karışım kapağı aktüatörü kontrol modülü; Fan motoru kontrol modülü; HVAC kontrol kafası modülü; HVAC röle kontrol modülü; Mod kapağı aktüatörü kontrol modülü; Arka HVAC kontrol modülü; Koltuk iklimlendirme kontrol modülü; Sıcaklık kapağı aktüatörü kontrol modülü; Diğer
lt-LT: Klimato kontrolės modulio funkcija: Kondicionieriaus stiprintuvo modulis; Maišymo sklendės pavaros valdymo modulis; Ventiliatoriaus variklio valdymo modulis; ŠVOK valdymo pulto modulis; ŠVOK relės valdymo modulis; Režimo sklendės pavaros valdymo modulis; Galinis ŠVOK valdymo modulis; Sėdynių klimato valdymo modulis; Temperatūros sklendės pavaros valdymo modulis; Kita
it: Functions Modules di controllo climatico: Modulo amplificatore aria condizionata; Modulo di controllo attuatore sportello miscelatore; Modulo di controllo motore ventola; Modulo unità di controllo HVAC; Modulo di controllo relè HVAC; Modulo di controllo attuatore sportello modalità; Modulo di controllo HVAC posteriore; Modulo di climatizzazione del sedile; Modulo di controllo attuatore sportello temperatura; Altro
sk-SK: Funkcia modulu klimatizácie: Modul zosilňovača klimatizácie; Riadiaci modul ovládača zmiešavacej klapky; Riadiaci modul motora ventilátora; Hlavný riadiaci modul HVAC; Riadiaci modul relé HVAC; Riadiaci modul ovládača klapky režimu; Zadný riadiaci modul HVAC; Riadiaci modul klimatizácie sedadiel; Riadiaci modul ovládača teplotnej klapky; Iné
vi: Chức năng mô-đun điều khiển khí hậu: Mô-đun khuếch đại AC; Mô-đun điều khiển cơ cấu chấp hành cửa trộn gió; Mô-đun điều khiển động cơ quạt gió; Mô-đun bảng điều khiển trung tâm HVAC; Mô-đun điều khiển rơ-le HVAC; Mô-đun điều khiển cơ cấu chấp hành cửa chọn chế độ gió; Mô-đun điều khiển HVAC phía sau; Mô-đun điều hòa ghế ngồi; Mô-đun điều khiển cơ cấu chấp hành cửa nhiệt độ; Khác
hr-HR: Funkcija modula kontrole klime: Modul pojačala klima-uređaja; Upravljački modul aktuatora zaklopke za miješanje; Upravljački modul motora ventilatora; Glavni upravljački modul HVAC-a; Upravljački modul releja HVAC-a; Upravljački modul aktuatora zaklopke za način rada; Stražnji upravljački modul HVAC-a; Upravljački modul klimatizacije sjedala; Upravljački modul aktuatora zaklopke za temperaturu; Ostalo
hu: Klímavezérlő modul funkció: Klímaerősítő modul; Levegőkeverő zsaluállító vezérlőmodul; Fúvómotor vezérlőmodul; HVAC-vezérlőfej modul; HVAC-relévezérlő modul; Üzemmód-zsaluállító vezérlőmodul; Hátsó HVAC-vezérlőmodul; Ülésklíma-vezérlőmodul; Hőmérséklet-zsaluállító vezérlőmodul; Egyéb
da: Klimastyringsmodulets funktion: AC-forstærkermodul; Kontrolmodul til blend door-aktuator; Kontrolmodul til blæsermotor; HVAC-kontrolmodul (hovedmodul); HVAC-relækontrolmodul; Kontrolmodul til mode door-aktuator; Bageste HVAC-kontrolmodul; Kontrolmodul til sædeklima; Kontrolmodul til temperatur-aktuator; Andet
fi: Ilmastointimoduulin hallinta: Ilmastoinnin vahvistinmoduuli; Sekoitusläpän toimilaitteen ohjausmoduuli; Puhallinmoottorin ohjausmoduuli; HVAC-pääohjausmoduuli; HVAC-releen ohjausmoduuli; Suuntausläpän toimilaitteen ohjausmoduuli; Takaosan HVAC-ohjausmoduuli; Istuimen ilmastoinnin ohjausmoduuli; Lämpötilaläpän toimilaitteen ohjausmoduuli; Muu
fr: Fonction du module de climatisation: Module amplificateur de climatisation; Module de commande de l’actionneur de volet de mixage; Module de commande du moteur de soufflante; Module de tête de commande CVC; Module de commande de relais CVC; Module de commande de l’actionneur de volet de mode; Module de commande CVC arrière; Module de climatisation de siège; Module de commande d’actionneur de volet de température; Autre
de: Funktion des Klimasteuerungsmoduls: Klimaanlagen-Verstärkermodul; Mischklappensteller-Steuermodul; Gebläsemotor-Steuermodul; HLK-Bedienteilmodul; HLK-Relaissteuermodul; Modusklappensteller-Steuermodul; Hinteres HLK-Steuermodul; Sitzklima-Steuermodul; Temperaturklappensteller-Steuermodul; Andere
ru: Функция модуля климат-контроля: Модуль усилителя кондиционера; Модуль управления приводом заслонки смешивания потоков; Модуль управления мотором вентилятора; Главный модуль управления HVAC; Модуль управления реле HVAC; Модуль управления приводом заслонки направления потоков; Задний модуль управления HVAC; Модуль управления климатом сидений; Модуль управления приводом температурной заслонки; Другое
en: Climate control module function: AC amplifier module; Blend door actuator control module; Blower motor control module; HVAC control head module; HVAC relay control module; Mode door actuator control module; Rear HVAC control module; Seat climate control module; Temperature door actuator control module; Other
nb: Klimakontroll modulfunksjon: AC-forsterkermodul; Kontrollmodul for blandedøraktuator; Kontrollmodul for viftemotor; HVAC-kontrollhodemodul; HVAC-relékontrollmodul; Kontrollmodul for modusdøraktuator; Bakre HVAC-kontrollmodul; Seteklimakontrollmodul; Kontrollmodul for temperaturdøraktuator; Annet
pt-PT: Função do módulo de controlo climático: Módulo do amplificador de ar condicionado; Módulo de controlo do atuador da porta de mistura; Módulo de controlo do motor do ventilador; Módulo principal de controlo de AVAC; Módulo de controlo de relé de AVAC; Módulo de controlo do atuador da porta de modo; Módulo de controlo de AVAC traseiro; Módulo de climatização dos bancos; Módulo de controlo do atuador da porta de temperatura; Outro
sv: Klimatkontrollmodulernas funktion: AC-förstärkarmodul; Kontrollmodul för blandningsspjällets ställdon; Kontrollmodul för fläktmotor; Huvudkontrollmodul för HVAC; Reläkontrollmodul för HVAC; Kontrollmodul för lägesspjällets ställdon; Bakre HVAC-kontrollmodul; Klimatkontrollmodul för säte; Kontrollmodul för temperaturspjällets ställdon; Övrigt
nl: Klimaatregelingsmodule functie: AC-versterkermodule; Regelmodule mengklepactuator; Regelmodule ventilatormotor; HVAC-regelkopmodule; HVAC-relaisregelmodule; Regelmodule modusklepactuator; Regelmodule HVAC achter; Klimaatregelingsmodule stoel; Regelmodule temperatuurklepactuator; Overig
th: ฟังก์ชันของโมดูลควบคุมสภาพอากาศ: โมดูลแอมพลิฟายเออร์แอร์; โมดูลควบคุมแอคชูเอเตอร์ประตูลมผสม; โมดูลควบคุมมอเตอร์พัดลมแอร์; โมดูลหัวควบคุม HVAC; โมดูลควบคุมรีเลย์ HVAC; โมดูลควบคุมแอคชูเอเตอร์ประตูลมโหมด; โมดูลควบคุม HVAC ด้านหลัง; โมดูลระบบควบคุมสภาพอากาศเบาะนั่ง; โมดูลควบคุมแอคชูเอเตอร์ประตูลมปรับอุณหภูมิ; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Funcția modulului de control al climei: Modul amplificator AC; Modul control actuator clapetă de amestec; Modul control motor ventilator; Modul central de control HVAC; Modul control releu HVAC; Modul control actuator clapetă de direcționare; Modul control HVAC spate; Modul control climatizare scaun; Modul control actuator clapetă de temperatură; Altele
cs: Funkce modulu klimatizace: Modul zesilovače klimatizace; Modul ovládání servomotoru mísící klapky; Modul ovládání motoru ventilátoru; Modul hlavní řídicí jednotky HVAC; Modul relé HVAC; Modul ovládání servomotoru klapky režimu; Řídicí modul zadní HVAC; Modul ovládání klimatizace sedadel; Modul ovládání servomotoru teplotní klapky; Jiné
pl: Funkcja modułu klimatyzacji: Moduł wzmacniacza klimatyzacji; Moduł sterowania siłownikiem klapy mieszalnika; Moduł sterowania silnikiem dmuchawy; Moduł panelu sterowania HVAC; Moduł sterowania przekaźnikiem HVAC; Moduł sterowania siłownikiem klapy nawiewu; Moduł sterowania tylnym układem HVAC; Moduł sterowania klimatyzacją foteli; Moduł sterowania siłownikiem klapy temperatury; Inny
bg-BG: Функция на модула за климатичен контрол: Модул за усилвател на климатик; Модул за управление на клапата за смесване на въздуха; Модул за управление на мотора на вентилатора; Главен контролен модул на ОВК; Модул за релейно управление на ОВК; Модул за управление на клапата за режим; Заден контролен модул на ОВК; Модул за климатичен контрол на седалките; Модул за управление на температурната клапа; Други
ja: 空調制御Modules Functions: エアコンアンプモジュール; エアミックスドアアクチュエーターコントロールモジュール; ブロアモーターコントロールモジュール; HVACコントロールヘッドモジュール; HVACリレーコントロールモジュール; モードドアアクチュエーターコントロールモジュール; リアHVACコントロールモジュール; シートクライメートコントロールモジュール; 温度ドアアクチュエーターコントロールモジュール; その他
el: Λειτουργία της μονάδας κλιματικού ελέγχου: Μονάδα ενισχυτή A/C; Μονάδα ελέγχου ενεργοποιητή θυρίδας μείξης αέρα; Μονάδα ελέγχου μοτέρ ανεμιστήρα; Κύρια μονάδα ελέγχου HVAC; Μονάδα ελέγχου ρελέ HVAC; Μονάδα ελέγχου ενεργοποιητή θυρίδας λειτουργίας; Πίσω μονάδα ελέγχου HVAC; Μονάδα ελέγχου κλιματισμού καθίσματος; Μονάδα ελέγχου ενεργοποιητή θυρίδας θερμοκρασίας; Άλλο
zh-CN: 气候控制模块功能: 空调放大器模块; 混合风门执行器控制模块; 鼓风机电机控制模块; HVAC 控制头模块; HVAC 继电器控制模块; 模式风门执行器控制模块; 后置 HVAC 控制模块; 座椅气候控制模块; 温度风门执行器控制模块; 其他
sl-SI: Delovanje modula za nadzor klime: Modul ojačevalnika klime; Modul aktuatorja za mešalno loputo; Nadzorni modul motorja ventilatorja; Nadzorni modul glave HVAC; Relejni nadzorni modul HVAC; Modul aktuatorja za loputo za izbiro načina; Zadnji nadzorni modul HVAC; Modul za klimatsko kontrolo sedežev; Modul aktuatorja za temperaturno loputo; Drugo
zh-TW: 空調控制模組功能: 冷氣放大器模組; 混合風門促動器控制模組; 鼓風機馬達控制模組; HVAC 控制頭模組; HVAC 繼電器控制模組; 模式風門促動器控制模組; 後座 HVAC 控制模組; 座椅恆溫控制模組; 溫度風門促動器控制模組; 其他